California statutes. Labor Code
 or district firefighter, shall be deemed to constitute family care and medical leave, as defined in Section 12945.2 of the Government Code, or to reduce the time authorized for family care and medical leave by Section 12945.2 of the Government Code.

(f) This section shall not apply to any persons described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) who are employees of the City and County of San Francisco.

(g) Amendments to subdivision (f) made by the act adding this subdivision shall be applied retroactively to January 1, 2010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 733, Sec. 1.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4850.3.

A city, county, special district, or harbor district that is a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, is subject to the County Employees Retirement Law of 1937, or is subject to the Los Angeles City Employees’ Retirement System, may make advanced disability pension payments to any local safety officer who has qualified for benefits under Section 4850 and is approved for a disability allowance. The payments shall be no less than 50 percent of the estimated highest average annual compensation earnable by the local safety officer during the three consecutive years of employment immediately preceding the effective date of his or her disability retirement, unless the local safety officer chooses an optional settlement in the permanent disability retirement application process which would reduce the pension allowance below 50 percent. In the case where the local safety officer’s choice lowers the disability pension allowance below 50 percent of average annual compensation as calculated, the advanced pension payments shall be set at an amount equal to the disability pension allowance. If a local agency has an adopted policy of paying for any accumulated sick leave after the safety officer is eligible for a disability allowance, the advanced disability pension payments under this section may only be made when the local safety officer has exhausted all sick leave payments. Advanced disability pension payments shall not be considered a salary under this or any other provision of law. All advanced disability pension payments made by a local agency with membership in the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall be reimbursed by the Public Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to Section 21293.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4850.4.

(a) A city, county, special district, or harbor district that is a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, is subject to the County Employees Retirement Law of 1937, or is subject to the Los Angeles City Employees’ Retirement Systems, shall make advanced disability pension payments in accordance with Section 4850.3 unless any of the following is applicable:

(1) After an examination of the employee by a physician, the physician determines that there is no discernable injury to, or illness of, the employee.

(2) The employee was incontrovertibly outside the course of his or her employment duties when the injury occurred.

(3) There is proof of fraud associated with the filing of the employee’s claim.

(b) Any employer described in subdivision (a) who is required to make advanced disability pension payments, shall make the payments commencing no later than 30 days from the date of issuance of the last disbursed of the following:

(1) The employee’s last regular payment of wages or salary.

(2) The employee’s last payment of benefits under Section 4850.

(3) The employee’s last payment for sick leave.

(c) The advanced disability payments shall continue until the claimant is approved or disapproved for a disability allowance pursuant to final adjudication as provided by law.

(d) An employer described in subdivision (a) shall be required to make advanced disability pension payments only if the employee does all of the following:

(1) Files an application for disability retirement at least 60 days prior to the payment of benefits pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) Fully cooperates in providing the employer with medical information and in attending all statutorily required medical examinations and evaluations set by the employer.

(3) Fully cooperates with the evaluation process established by the retirement plan.

(e) The 30-day period for the commencement of payments pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be tolled by whatever period of time is directly related to the employee’s failure to comply with the provisions of subdivision (d).

(f) After final adjudication, if an employee’s disability application is denied, the local agency and the employee shall arrange for the employee to repay any advanced disability pension payments received by the employee pursuant to this subdivision. The repayment plan shall take into account the employee’s ability to repay the advanced disability payments received. Absent an agreement on repayment, the matter shall be submitted for a local agency administrative appeals remedy that includes an independent level of resolution to determine a reasonable repayment plan. If repayment is not made according to the repayment plan, the local agency may take reasonable steps, including litigation, to recover the payments advanced.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 189) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 877, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4850.5.

Any firefighter employed by the County of San Luis Obispo, and the sheriff or any officer or employee of the sheriff’s office of the County of San Luis Obispo, and any county probation officer, group counselor, or juvenile services officer, or any officer or employee of a probation office, employed by the County of San Luis Obispo, shall, upon the adoption of a resolution of the board of supervisors so declaring, be entitled to the benefits of this article, if otherwise entitled to these benefits, even though the employee is not a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System or subject to the County Employees Retirement Law of 1937 (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 31450) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 3 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 970, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4850.7.

(a) Any firefighter employed by a dependent or independent fire district may be entitled to the benefits of this article, if otherwise entitled to these benefits, even though the employee is not a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System or subject to the County Employees Retirement Law of 1937 (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 31450) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 3 of the Government Code).

(b) The issue of whether the firefighters employed by a fire district are entitled to the benefits of this article is subject to Article 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Chapter 3 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(c) If the governing body of the district agrees that the benefits shall apply, it shall adopt a resolution to that effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 905, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4851.

The governing body of any city, county, or city and county, in addition to anyone else properly entitled, including the Public Employees’ Retirement System, may request the appeals board to determine in any case, and the appeals board shall determine, whether or not the disability referred to in Section 4850 arose out of and in the course of duty. The appeals board shall also, in any disputed case, determine when the disability commenced and ceased, and the amount of benefits provided by this division to which the employee is entitled during the period of the disability. The appeals board shall have jurisdiction to award and enforce payment of these benefits pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 5300).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1050, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.

The provisions of this article do not diminish or affect the right of any such officer or employee to the medical, surgical, and hospital benefits prescribed by this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1143.)
-------------------------------------------

4853.

Whenever such disability of any such officer or employee continues for a period beyond one year, such member shall thereafter be subject as to disability indemnity to the provisions of this division other than Section 4850 during the remainder of the period of said disability or until the effective date of his retirement under the Public Employees’ Retirement Act, and the leave of absence shall continue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 639.)
-------------------------------------------

4854.

No disability indemnity shall be paid to any such officer or employee concurrently with wages or salary payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1378.)
-------------------------------------------

4855.

This article shall not be applicable to individuals who are appointed as reserve public safety employees and are deemed to be employees of a county, city, town or district for workmen’s compensation purposes pursuant to Section 3362.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1178.)
-------------------------------------------

4856.

(a) Whenever any local employee who is a firefighter, peace officer as described in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or a Sheriff’s Special Officer of the County of Orange, is killed in the performance of their duty or dies as a result of an accident or injury caused by external violence or physical force incurred in the performance of their duty, the employer shall continue providing health benefits to the deceased employee’s spouse under the same terms and conditions provided prior to the death, or prior to the accident or injury that caused the death, of the employee unless the surviving spouse elects to receive a lump-sum
 survivors benefit in lieu of monthly benefits. Minor dependents shall continue to receive benefits under the coverage provided the surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, until 26 years of age. However, pursuant to Section 22822 of the Government Code, the surviving spouse may not add the new spouse or stepchildren as family members under the continued health benefits coverage of the surviving spouse.

(b) Subdivision (a) also applies to the employer of any local employee who is a firefighter, or peace officer as described in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, who was killed in the performance of their duty or who died as a result of an accident or injury caused by external violence or physical force incurred in the performance of their duty prior to September 30,
 1996.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 653, Sec. 1.   (SB 447)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. COMPENSATION CLAIMS [4900. - 5106.]



  CHAPTER 1. Payment and Assignment [4900. - 4909.1.]

4900.

No claim for compensation, except as provided in Section 96, is assignable before payment, but this provision does not affect the survival thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 555.)
-------------------------------------------

4901.

No claim for compensation nor compensation awarded, adjudged, or paid, is subject to be taken for the debts of the party entitled to such compensation except as hereinafter provided.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

4902.

No compensation, whether awarded or voluntarily paid, shall be paid to any attorney at law or in fact or other agent, but shall be paid directly to the claimant entitled thereto unless otherwise ordered by the appeals board. No payment made to an attorney at law or in fact or other agent in violation of this section shall be credited to the employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

4903.

The appeals board may determine, and allow as liens against any sum to be paid as compensation, any amount determined as hereinafter set forth in subdivisions (a) through (i). If more than one lien is allowed, the appeals board may determine the priorities, if any, between the liens allowed. The liens that may be allowed hereunder are as follows:

(a) A reasonable attorney’s fee for legal services pertaining to any claim for compensation either before the appeals board or before any of the appellate courts, and the reasonable disbursements in connection therewith. No fee for legal services shall be awarded to any representative who is not an attorney, except with respect to those claims for compensation for which an
 application, pursuant to Section 5501, has been filed with the appeals board on or before December 31, 1991, or for which a disclosure form, pursuant to Section 4906, has been sent to the employer, or insurer or third-party administrator, if either is known, on or before December 31, 1991.

(b) The reasonable expense incurred by or on behalf of the injured employee, as provided by Article 2 (commencing with Section 4600), and to the extent the employee is entitled to reimbursement under Section 4621, medical-legal expenses as provided by Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 4620) of Chapter 2 of Part 2, except those disputes subject to independent medical review or independent bill review.

(c) The reasonable value of the living expenses of an injured employee or of his or her dependents, subsequent to the injury.

(d) The reasonable burial expenses of the deceased employee, not to exceed the amount provided for by Section 4701.

(e) The reasonable living expenses of the spouse or minor children of the injured employee, or both, subsequent to the date of the injury, where the employee has deserted or is neglecting his or her family. These expenses shall be allowed in the proportion that the appeals board deems proper, under application of the spouse, guardian of the minor children, or the assignee, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11477 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, of the spouse, a former spouse, or minor children. A collection received as a result of a lien against a workers’ compensation award imposed pursuant to this subdivision for payment of child support ordered by a court shall be credited as provided in Section 695.221 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(f) The amount of unemployment compensation disability benefits that have been paid under or pursuant to the Unemployment Insurance Code in those cases where, pending a determination under this division there was uncertainty whether the benefits were payable under the Unemployment Insurance Code or payable hereunder; provided, however, that any lien under this subdivision shall be allowed and paid as provided in Section 4904.

(g) The amount of unemployment compensation benefits and extended duration benefits paid to the injured employee for the same day or days for which he or she receives, or is entitled to receive, temporary total disability indemnity payments under this division; provided, however, that any lien under this subdivision shall be allowed and paid as provided in Section 4904.

(h) The amount of family temporary disability insurance benefits that have
 been paid to the injured employee pursuant to the Unemployment Insurance Code for the same day or days for which that employee receives, or is entitled to receive, temporary total disability indemnity payments under this division, provided, however, that any lien under this subdivision shall be allowed and paid as provided in Section 4904.

(i) The amount of indemnification granted by the California Victims of Crime Program pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 13959) of Chapter 5 of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 217, Sec. 3.   (AB 2732)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4903.05.

(a) Every lien claimant shall file its lien with the appeals board in writing upon a form approved by the appeals board. The lien shall be accompanied by a full statement or itemized voucher supporting the lien and justifying the right to reimbursement and proof of service upon the injured worker or, if deceased, upon the worker’s dependents, the employer, the insurer, and the respective attorneys or other agents of record. For liens filed on or after January 1, 2017, the lien shall also be accompanied by an original bill in addition to either the full statement or itemized voucher supporting the lien. Medical records shall be filed only if they are relevant to the issues being raised by the lien.

(b) Any lien claim for expenses under subdivision (b) of Section 4903 or for claims of costs shall be filed with the appeals board electronically using the form approved by the appeals board. The lien shall be accompanied by a proof of service and any other documents that may be required by the appeals board. The service requirements for Section 4603.2 are not modified by this section.

(c) (1) For liens filed on or after January 1, 2017, any lien claim for expenses under subdivision (b) of Section 4903 that is subject to a filing fee under this section shall be accompanied at the time of filing by a declaration stating, under penalty of perjury, that the dispute is not subject to an independent bill review
 and independent medical review under Sections 4603.6 and 4610.5, respectively, that the lien claimant satisfies one of the following:

(A) Is the employee’s treating physician providing care through a medical provider network.

(B) Is the agreed medical evaluator or qualified medical evaluator.

(C) Has provided treatment authorized by the employer or claims administrator under Section 4610.

(D) Has made a diligent
 search and determined that the employer does not have a medical provider network in place.

(E) Has documentation that medical treatment has been neglected or unreasonably refused to the employee as provided by Section 4600.

(F) Can show that the expense was incurred for an emergency medical condition, as defined by subdivision (b) of Section 1317.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(G) Is a certified interpreter rendering services during a medical-legal examination, a copy service providing medical-legal services, or has an expense allowed
 as a lien under rules adopted by the administrative director.

(2) Lien claimants shall have until July 1, 2017, to file a declaration pursuant to paragraph (1) for any lien claim filed before January 1, 2017, for expenses pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4903 that is subject to a filing fee under this section.

(3) The failure to file a signed declaration under this subdivision shall result in the dismissal of the lien with prejudice by operation of law. Filing of a false declaration shall be grounds for dismissal with prejudice after notice.

(d) All liens filed on or after January 1, 2013, for expenses under subdivision (b) of Section 4903 or for
 claims of costs shall be subject to a filing fee as provided by this subdivision.

(1) The lien claimant shall pay a filing fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) to the Division of Workers’ Compensation prior to filing a lien and shall include proof that the filing fee has been paid. The fee shall be collected through an electronic payment system that accepts major credit cards and any additional forms of electronic payment selected by the administrative director. If the administrative director contracts with a service provider for the processing of electronic payments, any processing fee shall be absorbed by the division and not added to the fee charged to the lien filer.

(2) On or after January 1, 2013, a lien submitted for filing that does not comply with paragraph (1) shall be invalid, even if lodged with the appeals board, and shall not operate to preserve or extend any time
 limit for filing of the lien.

(3) The claims of two or more providers of goods or services shall not be merged into a single lien.

(4) The filing fee shall be collected by the administrative director. All fees shall be deposited in the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund and applied for the purposes of that fund.

(5) The administrative director shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations governing the procedure for the collection of the filing fee, including emergency regulations as necessary to implement this section.

(6) Any lien filed for goods or services that are not the proper subject of a lien may be dismissed upon request of a party by verified petition or on the appeals board’s own motion. If the lien is dismissed, the lien
 claimant will not be entitled to reimbursement of the filing fee.

(7) No filing fee shall be required for a lien filed by a health care service plan licensed pursuant to Section 1349 of the Health and Safety Code, a group disability insurer under a policy issued in this state pursuant to the provisions of Section 10270.5 of the Insurance Code, a self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, as defined in Section 10121 of the Insurance Code, that is issued in this state, a Taft-Hartley health and welfare fund, or a publicly funded program providing medical benefits on a nonindustrial basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 868, Sec. 8.   (SB 1160)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4903.06.

(a) Any lien filed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4903 prior to January 1, 2013, and any cost that was filed as a lien prior to January 1, 2013, shall be subject to a lien activation fee unless the lien claimant provides proof of having paid a filing fee as previously required by former Section 4903.05 as added by Chapter 639 of the Statutes of 2003.

(1) The lien claimant shall pay a lien activation fee of one hundred dollars ($100) to the Division of Workers’ Compensation on or before January 1, 2014. The fee shall be collected through an electronic payment system that accepts major credit cards and any additional forms of electronic payment selected by the administrative director. If the administrative director contracts with a
 service provider for the processing of electronic payments, any processing fee shall be absorbed by the division and not added to the fee charged to the lien filer.

(2) The lien claimant shall include proof of payment of the filing fee or lien activation fee with the declaration of readiness to proceed.

(3) The lien activation fee shall be collected by the administrative director. All fees shall be deposited in the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund and applied for the purposes of that fund. The administrative director shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations governing the procedure for the collection of the lien activation fee and to implement this section, including emergency regulations, as necessary.

(4) All lien claimants that did not file the declaration of readiness to proceed and that
 remain a lien claimant of record at the time of a lien conference shall submit proof of payment of the activation fee at the lien conference. If the fee has not been paid or no proof of payment is available, the lien shall be dismissed with prejudice.

(5) Any lien filed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4903 prior to January 1, 2013, and any cost that was filed as a lien prior to January 1, 2013, for which the filing fee or lien activation fee has not been paid by January 1, 2014, is dismissed by operation of law.

(b) This section shall not apply to any lien filed by a health care service plan licensed pursuant to Section 1349 of the Health and Safety Code, a group disability insurer under a policy issued in this state pursuant to the provisions of Section 10270.5 of the Insurance Code, a self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, as defined in Section 10121 of the Insurance
 Code, that is issued in this state, a Taft-Hartley health and welfare fund, or a publicly funded program providing medical benefits on a nonindustrial basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 64.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4903.07.

(a) A lien claimant shall be entitled to an order or award for reimbursement from the employer of a lien filing fee or lien activation fee, together with interest at the rate allowed on civil judgments, only if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) Not less than 30 days before filing the lien for which the filing fee was paid or filing the declaration of readiness for which the lien activation fee was paid, the lien claimant has made written demand for settlement of the lien claim for a clearly stated sum which shall be inclusive of all claims of debt, interest, penalty, or other claims potentially recoverable on the lien.

(2) The defendant
 fails to accept the settlement demand in writing within 20 days of receipt of the demand for settlement, or within any additional time as may be provide by the written demand.

(3) After submission of the lien dispute to the appeals board or an arbitrator, a final award is made in favor of the lien claimant of a specified sum that is equal to or greater than the amount of the settlement demand. The amount of the interest and filing fee or lien activation fee shall not be considered in determining whether the award is equal to or greater than the demand.

(b) This section shall not preclude an order or award of reimbursement of the filing fee or activation fee pursuant to the express terms of an agreed disposition of a lien dispute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 217, Sec. 4.   (AB 2732)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4903.1.

(a) The appeals board or arbitrator, before issuing an award or approval of any compromise of claim, shall determine, on the basis of liens filed with it pursuant to Section 4903.05, whether any benefits have been paid or services provided by a health care provider, a health care service plan, a group
 disability policy, including a
 loss-of-income policy or a self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, and its award or approval shall provide for reimbursement for benefits paid or services provided under these plans as follows:

(1) If the appeals board issues an award finding that an injury or illness arises out of and in the course of employment, but denies the applicant reimbursement for self-procured medical costs solely
 because of lack of notice to the applicant’s employer of his or her need for hospital, surgical, or medical care, the appeals board shall nevertheless award a lien against the employee’s recovery, to the extent of benefits paid or services provided, for the effects of the industrial injury or illness, by a health care provider, a health care service plan, a group disability policy or a self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, subject to the provisions described in subdivision (b).

(2) If the appeals board issues an award finding that an injury or illness arises out of and in the course of employment, and makes an award for reimbursement for self-procured medical costs, the appeals board shall allow a lien, to the extent of benefits paid or services provided, for the effects of the industrial injury or illness, by a health care provider, a health care service plan, a group disability policy or a self-insured employee welfare benefit plan,
 subject to the provisions of subdivision (b). For purposes of this paragraph, benefits paid or services provided by a self-insured employee welfare benefit plan shall be determined notwithstanding the official medical fee schedule adopted pursuant to Section 5307.1.

(3) (A) If the appeals board issues an award finding that an injury or illness arises out of and in the course of employment and makes an award for temporary disability indemnity, the appeals board shall allow
 a lien as living expense under Section 4903, for benefits paid by a group disability policy providing
 loss-of-time benefits and for loss-of-time benefits paid by a self-insured employee welfare benefit plan. The lien shall be allowed to the extent that benefits have been paid for the same day or days for which temporary disability indemnity is awarded and shall not exceed the award for temporary disability indemnity. A lien shall not be allowed hereunder unless the group disability policy or self-insured employee welfare benefit plan provides for reduction, exclusion, or coordination of
 loss-of-time
 benefits on account of workers’ compensation benefits.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “self-insured employee welfare benefit plan” means any plan, fund, or program that is established or maintained by an employer or by an employee organization, or by both, to the extent that the plan, fund, or program was established or is maintained for the purpose of providing for its participants or their beneficiaries, other than through the purchase of insurance, either of the following:

(i) Medical, surgical, or hospital care or benefits.

(ii) Monetary or other benefits in the event of sickness, accident, disability, death, or unemployment.

(4) If the parties propose that the case be disposed of by way of a compromise and release agreement, in the event the lien claimant, other than a health care provider, does not agree to the amount allocated to it, then the appeals board shall determine the potential recovery and reduce the amount of the lien in the ratio of the applicant’s recovery to the potential recovery in full satisfaction of its lien claim.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), payment or reimbursement shall not be allowed, whether payable by the employer or payable as a lien against the employee’s recovery, for any expense incurred as provided by Article 2 (commencing with Section 4600) of Chapter 2 of Part 2, nor shall the employee have any liability for the expense, if at the time the expense was incurred the provider either knew or in the exercise of reasonable diligence should have known that the condition being treated was caused by the employee’s present or prior employment, unless at the time the expense was incurred at least one of the following conditions was met:

(1) The expense was incurred for services authorized by the employer.

(2) The expense was incurred for services furnished while the employer failed or refused to furnish treatment as
 required by subdivision (c) of Section 5402.

(3) The expense was necessarily incurred for an emergency medical condition, as defined by subdivision (b) of Section 1317.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The changes made to this section by Senate Bill 457 of the 2011–12 Regular Session do not modify in any way the rights or obligations of the following:

(1) Any health care provider to file and prosecute a lien pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4903.

(2) A payer to conduct utilization review pursuant to Section 4610.

(3) Any party in complying with the requirements under Section 4903.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 712, Sec. 1.5.   (SB 1105)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4903.2.

Where a lien claimant is reimbursed pursuant to subdivision (f) or (g) of Section 4903 or Section 4903.1, for benefits paid or services provided, the appeals board may award an attorney’s fee to the applicant’s attorney out of the lien claimant’s recovery if the appeals board determines that all of the following occurred:

(a) The lien claimant received notice of all hearings following the filing of the lien and received notice of intent to award the applicant’s attorney a fee. 

(b) An attorney or other representative of the lien claimant did not participate in the proceedings before the appeals board with respect to the lien claim. 

(c) There were bona fide issues respecting compensability, or respecting allowability of the lien, such that the services of an attorney were reasonably required to effectuate recovery on the claim of lien and were instrumental in effecting the recovery.

(d) The case was not disposed of by compromise and release.

The amount of the attorney’s fee out of the lien claimant’s recovery shall be based on the extent of applicant’s attorney’s efforts on behalf of the lien claimant. The ratio of the amount of the attorney’s fee awarded against the lien claimant’s recovery to that recovery shall not exceed the ratio of the amount of the attorney’s fee awarded against the applicant’s award to that award.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 108.)
-------------------------------------------

4903.3.

The director, as administrator of the Uninsured Employers Fund, may, in his discretion, provide compensation, including medical treatment, from the Uninsured Employers Fund in cases to which the director is a party before the issuance of any award, if such compensation is not being provided to the applicant.

The appeals board shall determine and allow as a first lien against any sum to be paid as compensation the amount of compensation, including the cost of medical treatment, provided by the director pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 894, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

4903.4.

(a) If a dispute arises concerning a lien for expenses incurred by or on behalf of the injured employee as provided by Article 2 (commencing with Section 4600) of Chapter 2 of Part 2, the appeals board may resolve the dispute in a separate proceeding, which may include binding arbitration upon agreement of the employer, lien claimant, and the employee, if the employee remains a party to the dispute, according to the rules of practice and procedure.

(b) If the dispute is heard at a separate proceeding it shall be calendared for hearing or hearings as determined by the appeals board based upon the resources available to the appeals board and other considerations as the appeals board deems appropriate and shall not be subject
 to Section 5501.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 287, Sec. 6.   (SB 375)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4903.5.

(a) A lien claim for expenses as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 4903 shall not be filed after three years from the date the services were provided, nor more than 18 months after the date the services were provided, if the services were provided on or after July 1, 2013.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any health care service plan licensed pursuant to Section 1349 of the Health and Safety Code, group disability insurer under a policy issued in this state pursuant to the provisions of Section 10270.5 of the Insurance Code, self-insured employee welfare benefit plan issued in this state as defined in Section 10121 of the Insurance Code, Taft-Hartley health and welfare fund, or publicly funded program providing
 medical benefits on a nonindustrial basis, may file a lien claim for expenses as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 4903 within 12 months after the entity first knew or in the exercise of reasonable diligence should have known that an industrial injury is being claimed, but in no event later than five years from the date the services were provided to the employee.

(c) The injured worker shall not be liable for any underlying obligation if a lien claim has not been filed and served within the allowable period. Except when the lien claimant is the applicant as provided in Section 5501 or as otherwise permitted by rules of practice and procedure adopted by the appeals board, a lien claimant shall not file a declaration of readiness to proceed in any case until the case-in-chief has been resolved.

(d) This section shall not apply to civil actions brought under the Cartwright Act
 (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), or the federal Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organization Act (Chapter 96 (commencing with Section 1961) of Title 18 of the United States Code) based on concerted action with other insurers that are not parties to the case in which the lien or claim is filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 68.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4903.6.

(a) Except as necessary to meet the requirements of Section 4903.5, a lien claim or application for adjudication shall not be filed or served under subdivision (b) of Section 4903 until both of the following have occurred:

(1) Sixty days have elapsed after the date of acceptance or rejection of liability for the claim, or expiration of the time provided for investigation of liability pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5402, whichever date is earlier.

(2) Either of the following:

(A) The time provided for payment of medical treatment bills pursuant to Section 4603.2 has expired and, if the employer objected to the amount of the bill,
 the reasonable fee has been determined pursuant to Section 4603.6, and, if authorization for the medical treatment has been disputed pursuant to Section 4610, the medical necessity of the medical treatment has been determined pursuant to Sections 4610.5 and 4610.6.

(B) The time provided for payment of medical-legal expenses pursuant to Section 4622 has expired and, if the employer objected to the amount of the bill, the reasonable fee has been determined pursuant to Section 4603.6.

(b) All lien claimants under Section 4903 shall notify the employer and the employer’s representative, if any, and the employee and the employee’s representative, if any, and the appeals board within five working days of obtaining, changing, or discharging representation by an attorney or nonattorney representative. The notice shall set forth the legal name, address, and telephone number of the attorney
 or nonattorney representative.

(c) A declaration of readiness to proceed shall not be filed for a lien under subdivision (b) of Section 4903 until the underlying case has been resolved or where the applicant chooses not to proceed with the applicant’s case.

(d) With the exception of a lien for services provided by a physician as defined in Section 3209.3, a lien claimant shall not be entitled to any medical information, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 56.05 of the Civil Code, about an injured worker without prior written approval of the appeals board. Any order authorizing disclosure of medical information to a lien claimant other than a physician shall specify the information to be provided to the lien claimant and include a finding that the information is relevant to the proof of the matter for which the information is sought. The appeals board shall adopt reasonable
 regulations to ensure compliance with this section, and shall take any further steps as may be necessary to enforce the regulations, including, but not limited to, impositions of sanctions pursuant to Section 5813.

(e) The prohibitions of this section do not apply to lien claims, applications for adjudication, or declarations of readiness to proceed filed by or on behalf of the employee, or to the filings by or on behalf of the employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 144.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4903.8.
